Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-707
Appraisers; disqualifications; vacancies; appointment.

Upon convening of the appraisers, the county judge shall interrogate the appraisers as to their qualifications and may excuse any appraiser found by the county judge to be disqualified to serve. The county judge may fill any vacancies arising through disqualification, inability to attend, or otherwise.

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 7, p. 454.